Utah statutes.
13-49-202.   Application for registration.

(1)  To register as an immigration consultant a person shall:

(a)  submit an application in a form prescribed by the division;

(b)  pay a fee determined by the department in accordance with Section 63J-1-504, which includes the costs of the criminal background check required under Subsection (1)(e);

(c)  have good moral character in that the applicant has not be convicted of:

(i)  a felony; or

(ii)  within the last 10 years, a misdemeanor involving theft, fraud, or dishonesty;

(d)  submit fingerprint cards in a form acceptable to the division at the time the application is filed; and

(e)  consent to a fingerprint background check by the Utah Bureau of Criminal Identification regarding the application.

(2)  The division shall register a person who qualifies under this chapter as an immigration consultant.

